Utah statutes.
20A-16-503.   Prohibition of nonsubstantive requirements.

(1) (a)  If a covered voter's mistake or omission in the completion of a document under this chapter does not prevent determining whether a covered voter is eligible to vote, the mistake or omission does not invalidate the document.

(b)  Failure to satisfy a nonsubstantive requirement, such as using paper or envelopes of a specified size or weight, does not invalidate a document submitted under this chapter.

(c)  In a write-in ballot authorized by this chapter or in a vote for a write-in candidate on a regular ballot, if the intention of the covered voter is discernable under this state's uniform definition of what constitutes a vote, an abbreviation, misspelling, or other minor variation in the form of the name of a candidate or a political party is a valid vote.

(2) (a)  Notarization is not required for the execution of a document under this chapter.

(b) (i)  An authentication, other than the declaration specified in Section 20A-16-409 or the declaration on the federal postcard application and federal write-in absentee ballot, is not required for execution of a document under this chapter.

(ii)  The declaration and any information in the declaration may be compared with information on file to ascertain the validity of the document.



Enacted by Chapter 327, 2011 General Session

